Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-528
Intent and purpose.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the citizens of the State of Nebraska benefit by participation in national efforts to take innovative action to provide immunization of our children by removal of barriers which impede vaccine delivery and by improving access to immunization services.

(2) It is also the purpose of the Childhood Vaccine Act to provide authorization for childhood immunization programs and demonstration or pilot projects that document childhood immunization trends, encourage cooperation between and use of both private practitioners and public providers in offering health care to children, and otherwise assess a total approach to immunization against childhood diseases.

Laws 1992, LB 431, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 31.